Missouri, session 2026, HB3006.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 30, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 30.980, to read as follows:
30.980. 1. There is hereby created within the office of the state treasurer the
position of "Coordinator of Federal Funds Recovery". The coordinator's primary duty
shall be monitoring the status of all federal funds appropriated to the state of Missouri.
2. The coordinator shall be authorized to attempt to recover any funds
appropriated but not disbursed to the state of Missouri through any available means
including, but not limited to, filing actions in a court of competent jurisdiction.
3. The coordinator shall establish a process for state employees to report funds
that were appropriated by the federal government but never disbursed. The
coordinator shall not be required to recover federal funds that simply pass through
the state on their way to local allocations in the form of grants, formula shares, or
federal supplementals. However, the coordinator shall ensure the state does exact its
administrative share from federal pass-through funds.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.